src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-taivas-norm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - taivas: # GOLD
    taivas+N+Sg+Nom: taivas
    taivas+N+Sg+Gen: [taihvaan, taivhaan]
    taivas+N+Sg+Par: taivasta
    taivas+N+Sg+Tra: [taihvaaksi, taivhaaksi]
    taivas+N+Sg+Abe: [taihvaatta, taivhaatta]
    taivas+N+Sg+Ine: [taihvaassa, taivhaassa]
    taivas+N+Sg+Ela: [taihvaasta, taivhaasta]
    taivas+N+Sg+Ill: [taihvaasheen, taivhaasheen]
    taivas+N+Sg+Ade: [taihvaala, taivhaala]
    taivas+N+Sg+Abl: [taihvaalta, taivhaalta]
    taivas+N+Sg+All: [taihvaale, taivhaale]
    taivas+N+Sg+Ess: [taihvaana, taivhaana]
    taivas+N+Pl+Nom: taivhaat
    taivas+N+Pl+Gen: [taihvaitten, taivhaitten]
    taivas+N+Pl+Par: [taihvaita, taivhaita]
    taivas+N+Pl+Tra: [taihvaiksi, taivhaiksi]
    taivas+N+Pl+Abe: [taihvaitta, taivhaitta]
    taivas+N+Pl+Ine: [taihvaissa, taivhaissa]
    taivas+N+Pl+Ela: [taihvaista, taivhaista]
    taivas+N+Pl+Ill: [taihvain, taivhain]
    taivas+N+Pl+Ade: [taihvaila, taivhaila]
    taivas+N+Pl+Abl: [taihvailta, taivhailta]
    taivas+N+Pl+All: [taihvaile, taivhaile]
    taivas+N+Pl+Ess: [taihvaina, taivhaina]

Noun - tehas: # GOLD
    tehas+N+Sg+Nom: tehas
    tehas+N+Sg+Gen: tehthaan
    tehas+N+Sg+Par: tehasta
    tehas+N+Sg+Tra: tehthaaksi
    tehas+N+Sg+Abe: tehthaatta
    tehas+N+Sg+Ine: tehthaassa
    tehas+N+Sg+Ela: tehthaasta
    tehas+N+Sg+Ill: tehthaasheen
    tehas+N+Sg+Ade: tehthaala
    tehas+N+Sg+Abl: tehthaalta
    tehas+N+Sg+All: tehthaale
    tehas+N+Sg+Ess: tehthaana
    tehas+N+Pl+Nom: tehthaat
    tehas+N+Pl+Gen: tehthaitten
    tehas+N+Pl+Par: tehthaita
    tehas+N+Pl+Tra: tehthaiksi
    tehas+N+Pl+Abe: tehthaitta
    tehas+N+Pl+Ine: tehthaissa
    tehas+N+Pl+Ela: tehthaista
    tehas+N+Pl+Ill: tehthain
    tehas+N+Pl+Ade: tehthaila
    tehas+N+Pl+Abl: tehthailta
    tehas+N+Pl+All: tehthaile
    tehas+N+Pl+Ess: tehthaina
